Tennessee, session 114, HB0023.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 6-53-110, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
( ) As used in this section, "district" means a district, region, precinct, sector,
territory, or other geographical area prescribed for the purposes of nominating and
electing candidates in accordance with this section.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0023
000485
- 1 -